California statutes. Education Code
(f) That a lease or agreement will be entered into with a nonprofit corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17438.

After adoption of the resolution ordering implementation of the school facilities plan, the resolution shall be recorded with the county recorder of the county or counties in which the real property subject to the owner’s development lien is located.

Upon recordation of the resolution, an owner’s development lien is hereby created and attaches to the real property described therein for the cost of implementing the school facilities plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17439.

No sooner than 90 days from the date a resolution is recorded pursuant to Section 17438, a nonprofit corporation which has entered into a lease or agreement with the school district pursuant to this article may issue bonds for the purpose of financing all or a portion of the school facilities plan approved pursuant to procedures of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17440.

Except as provided in Section 2192.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, an owner’s development lien imposed for the purposes of this article shall have the same priority as special assessment liens described in Article 13 (commencing with Section 53930) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Except as to any due, unpaid and delinquent amount, the owner’s development lien shall not be deemed to be a prior encumbrance within the meaning of Section 766 of the Financial Code. From and after the date of the recording of the owner’s development lien, all persons shall be deemed to have notice of the contents thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17441.

Additional territory may be added to the area described as being benefited by the school facilities plan in the discretion of the governing board, provided the owners of the real property to be added consent to the imposition of a lien for all present and future obligations as set forth in the school facilities plan and agree to pay to the district an amount at least equal to all amounts collected pursuant to the owner’s development lien.

Any additional territory added to the area benefited by the school facilities plan pursuant to this section shall be the subject of a resolution described in Section 17437 and recorded pursuant to Section 17438.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17442.

The governing board may bill and collect pursuant to the owner’s development lien and collect payments from the owners of all property subject to an owner’s development lien in amounts sufficient for the district to meet its rental obligations under any lease or agreement and to pay or reimburse any expenses incurred to implement the school facilities plan. The amounts due pursuant to the owner’s development liens shall be billed and collected in equal amounts on each acre or portion thereof as provided for in the owner’s development lien or as provided for in Sections 17437 and 17447.

A school district electing to utilize the provisions of this article may enter into a contract with the county tax collector for the billing of the annual amounts billed pursuant to this section. The tax collector may collect these amounts together with and not separate from the taxes on the property. The county tax collector shall be entitled to a fee for the reasonable value of his or her services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17443.

An owner’s development lien may be released by the governing board, provided funds are deposited with the board to pay the unpaid principal amount of the lien, plus any prepayment charges in an amount to be determined by the governing board.

Upon receipt of these amounts, the board shall adopt a resolution specifically providing a legal description of the real property and the record title owners thereof subject to the release. The resolution shall be recorded with the county recorder of the county or counties in which the real property is located. Upon recordation of the resolution, the owner’s development lien shall be discharged and of no further effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17444.

(a) Any installment of an owner’s development lien created pursuant to this article shall become delinquent 30 days following billing thereof if unpaid, or if the installment is being collected by the county tax collector, at the time general taxes become delinquent. An installment shall be in default 30 days after written notice of the delinquency has been given by certified or registered mail to the record owner of the property subject to the lien and all lenders of record.

(b) The governing board, not later than four years after the date of default of any payment, may order that the amount be collected by an action brought in superior court to
 foreclose against the real property subject to the owner’s development lien for the then delinquent installment of the owner’s development lien. The action shall affect only the delinquent amounts and shall not accelerate or require payment of any remaining amount of the owner’s development lien.

(c) The lease agreement between the governing board and the nonprofit corporation may contain covenants for the benefit of bondholders providing that the governing board shall commence and diligently prosecute to completion any foreclosure action regarding delinquent installments of an owner’s development lien. The lease agreement may specify a deadline for commencement of the foreclosure action and any other terms and conditions that the governing board may determine to be reasonable.

(d) The
 governing board may assign its rights under this section to the nonprofit corporation or to any trustee under the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 17437.

(e) Costs in the action shall be fixed and allowed by the court and shall include, but are not limited to, reasonable attorneys’ fees, interest, penalties and other charges or advances authorized by this article, and when so fixed and allowed by the court, the costs shall be included in the judgment. The amount of penalties, costs, and interest due shall be calculated up to the date of judgment.

(f) All matters pertaining to foreclosure, execution and sale shall be governed by the then existing law of California. However, notwithstanding any other law, the owner’s right of redemption shall be limited to 60 days following
 the date of sale of the owner’s interest. The owner’s development lien shall continue as security for all future required installment payments. Any remaining funds after foreclosure and payment of all obligations and costs of foreclosure of the delinquent installment of the owner’s development lien shall be paid pursuant to the priority of encumbrances of record and to the owner or owner’s successor as of the date of initiation of the foreclosure proceeding.

(g) Foreclosures of installments of the owner’s development lien pursuant to this article shall not affect the priority of any scheme of community development approved by the Bureau of Real Estate, including, but not limited to, subdivision maps, condominium plans, covenants, conditions, restrictions, and easements whether recorded prior to or subsequent to the owner’s development
 lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 67.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

17445.

Any action to contest the validity of this article may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that an appeal from any judgment rendered in such action shall be made directly to the Supreme Court of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17446.

Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this article, and as an alternative method of accomplishing the purposes of this article, owner’s development liens may be imposed in unequal amounts on each acre or portion thereof in order that the liens may be based upon equal or equitable amounts for each individual dwelling unit after subdivision into lots or condominium units.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17447.

(a) As an alternate provision, owner’s development liens previously imposed upon a particular parcel or parcels of property which are subsequently subdivided may be apportioned to provide that the owner’s development liens shall be imposed upon the individual lots and condominium units created by one or more subdivisions. The liens need not necessarily be imposed upon a pro rata basis based upon acreage, but may be imposed pursuant to Section 17446 to provide for an equal or equitable portion of the total lien to be imposed upon each individual dwelling unit or resulting separate parcel. In imposing the owner’s development liens on individual lots and condominium units, there may be excluded from the liens property which becomes subject to restrictions that preclude development thereon including, but not limited to, areas of common ownership, streets, and easements. Prior to the apportionments of an owner’s development lien pursuant to this section, the governing board of the school district shall adopt a resolution which shall include the following:

(1) A legal description of the real property on which an owner’s development lien has previously been imposed.

(2) The intention of the governing board to apportion the owner’s development lien to provide for an equitable apportionment of the lien upon individual lots and condominium units within the properties to be subdivided.

(3) A map showing the subdivided lands, together with the proposed owner’s development liens to be imposed upon the individual lots and condominium units within one or more such subdivisions.

(b) Upon adoption of the resolution, the secretary of the school district shall mail a copy of the resolution to each owner of the property upon which the owner’s development lien has previously been imposed as shown on the last equalized assessment roll. A copy of this resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. The secretary of the school district shall mail copies of the resolution to any beneficiary of deeds of trust upon the property. No sooner than 30 days after the mailings, the governing board may consider objections to the proposed apportionment of the owner’s development lien. Provided that all owners of the parcels over which the lien is to be apportioned, including any beneficiary under any deeds of trust, or any beneficiary under any deed of trust, have consented, the owner’s development lien may be apportioned to provide for an equitable portion of the total development lien to be placed upon the individual lots, condominium units or separate parcels created within one or more of the subdivisions. A resolution approving the apportionment of the owner’s development lien shall thereafter be adopted and recorded with the county recorder of the county or counties in which the real property is located. Apportionment pursuant to this section shall be effective upon the recordation. The apportionment of the owner’s development lien shall in no way either increase or decrease the total amount of the owner’s development lien which has previously been imposed upon the properties involved. However, the original owner’s development lien which had been previously imposed shall be released of record at the time the apportionment of the lien pursuant to this section is recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Leasing of Equipment [17450. - 17453.1.]

17450.

Any school district or any county superintendent of schools may, as lessee, enter into a lease or lease-purchase agreement for equipment or service systems with any persons, firm, corporation or public agency. As used in this article “equipment” includes all of the following:

(1) Schoolbuses.

(2) Other motor vehicles.

(3) Test materials, educational films, and audiovisual materials.

(4) All other items defined as equipment or service systems in the California School Accounting Manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17451.

Before a lease or lease-purchase agreement may be entered into the lessee shall comply with all applicable provisions for bids and contracts prescribed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 17595) of Chapter 5 of this part. Each contract shall show the total price for an outright purchase of any item and also its total cost for the entire specified term of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17452.

The term of any lease or lease-purchase agreement shall not exceed the estimated useful life of the item but in no event shall the term exceed 10 years. A lease, but not a lease-purchase agreement, may be renewable at the option of the lessee and the lessor, jointly, at the end of each term at a rate not more than 12 percent annually above the rate set pursuant to the existing agreement. In no event shall the combined period of the original lease and renewals or extensions exceed 10 years. Any contract for the lease or lease-purchase of equipment or service systems which was in existence prior to April 22, 1975, shall remain in effect and such terms are hereby ratified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17453.

As a lessor, a school district governing board is authorized to let, or let with option to purchase, any land, buildings, or equipment it determines is not needed for school purposes for a term extending to the end of the expected nonuse of the land, buildings, or equipment and under any conditions it deems reasonable. All of these leases and leases with options to purchase to nonpublic agencies or individuals shall comply with the provisions of Sections 17545, 17546, 17547, and 17548.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17453.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school district may sell or lease Internet appliances or personal computers to parents of pupils within the school district, for the purpose of providing access to the school district’s educational computer network, at a standard price, not to exceed the cost incurred by the school district in purchasing the Internet appliance or personal computer. A school district that elects to sell or lease Internet appliances or personal computers, as authorized by this section, shall provide access to the school district’s educational network for those families that cannot afford access to the school district’s educational network. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in conducting a sale or lease pursuant to this section a school district shall not be required to call for bids or to sell or lease Internet appliances or personal computers to the highest bidder. For purposes of this section, an “Internet appliance” is a technological product that allows a person to connect to, or access, an online educational network.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the Internet appliances or personal computers that are sold or leased pursuant to this section are not an essential part of the school district’s educational program, but are supplemental to that program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 896, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Sale or Lease of Real Property [17455. - 17484.]

17455.

The governing board of any school district may sell any real property belonging to the school district or may lease for a term not exceeding 99 years, any real property, together with any personal property located thereon, belonging to the school district which is not or will not be needed by the district for school classroom buildings at the time of delivery of title or possession. The sale or lease may be made without first taking a vote of the electors of the district, and shall be made in the manner provided by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17456.

Notwithstanding Section 17455, the sale by the governing board of a school district of any real property belonging to the school district or the lease by that governing board, for a term not exceeding 99 years, of any real property, together with any personal property located thereon, belonging to the school district shall not be subject to any other provision of this chapter, to Article 5 (commencing with Section 17485), or to Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The property is sold or leased to another local governmental agency, or to a
 nonprofit corporation that is organized for the purpose of assisting one or more local governmental agencies in obtaining financing.

(b) (1) In the case of the sale of school district property pursuant to this section, the school district, as part of that same sale transaction, simultaneously repurchases the same property that is the subject of the transaction.

(2) In the case of the lease of school district property pursuant to this section, the school district, as part of that same lease transaction, simultaneously leases back, for a term that is not substantially less than the term of that lease, the same property that is the subject of the transaction.

(c) (1) The financing
 proceeds obtained by the school district pursuant to the transaction described in this section are expended solely for capital outlay purposes, including the acquisition of real property for intended use as a schoolsite and the construction, reconstruction, and renovation of school facilities.

(2) For purposes of this section, the construction, reconstruction, or renovation of rental housing facilities for school district employees constitutes a permissible capital outlay expenditure of the financing proceeds obtained by the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 717, Sec. 2.   (AB 1157)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17457.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, in connection with a sale, sale back, lease, or leaseback of school district property, no proceeds obtained by the school district from the sale of the sale back or leaseback agreement, or interests therein, or a debt instrument payable from payments under the sale back or leaseback agreement shall be used for general operating purposes of the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17457.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, the governing board of a school district seeking to sell or lease real property designed to provide direct instruction or instructional support it deems to be surplus property shall first offer that property for sale or lease to any charter school that, at the time of the offer, has projections of at least 80 units of in-district average daily attendance for the following fiscal year, and has submitted a written request to the school district to be notified of surplus property offered for sale or lease by the school district, pursuant to the following conditions:

(1) The real property sold
 or leased shall be used by the charter school exclusively to provide direct instruction or instructional support.

(2) If the charter school purchased real property pursuant to this section and fails to comply with paragraph (1), or otherwise desires to dispose of the real property, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The charter school shall immediately offer that real property for sale to the school district that previously owned the property. The charter school shall comply, in that regard, with all requirements under this section that would otherwise apply to a school district.

(B) If the school district does not desire to purchase that real property from the charter school, the school district shall furnish a list of charter schools that have requested notification of surplus property pursuant to subdivision
 (a). The charter school that owns the real property shall offer that real property for sale to the charter schools on this list and comply with all requirements under this section that would otherwise apply to a school district. In the event the charter school selling property receives more than one offer, the charter school may determine to which charter school it will sell the property. The charter school purchasing the real property shall comply with all provisions of this section.

(C) If that real property remains unsold pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), the charter school selling the real property shall offer that property for sale pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 17485). The charter school shall comply with all requirements under that article that would otherwise apply to a school district, except that a sale price computed under subdivision (a) of Section 17491 shall be based upon the cost of acquisition incurred by the
 school district that sold the property pursuant to this subdivision, rather than that incurred by the charter school.

(D) If all or part of the real property remains unsold pursuant to subparagraph (C), the charter school selling that real property shall dispose of the remaining property pursuant to subdivisions (c), (d), (e), and (f) of Section 17464. References in Section 17464 to a school district shall mean the charter school selling the real property.

(3) In the event, alternatively, of a lease of real property pursuant to this subdivision, the failure by the charter school to comply with paragraph (1) shall constitute a breach of the lease, entitling the school district to immediate possession of the real property, in addition to any damages to which the school district may be entitled under the lease agreement.

(4) The school district, and each of the entities authorized to receive offers of sale pursuant to this article or Article 5 (commencing with Section 17485), has standing to enforce the conditions set forth in this subdivision, and shall be entitled to the payment of reasonable attorney’s fees incurred as a prevailing party in any action or proceeding brought to enforce any of those conditions.

(b) A school district seeking to sell or lease real property designed to provide direct instruction or instructional support it deems to be surplus property shall provide a written offer to any charter school that, at the time of the offer, has projections of at least 80 units of in-district average daily attendance for the following fiscal year, and has submitted a written request to the school district to be notified of surplus property offered for sale or lease by the school district. A charter school desiring to purchase or lease the
 property shall, within 60 days after a written offer is received, notify the school district of its intent to purchase or lease the property. In the event more than one charter school notifies the school district of their intent to purchase or lease the property, the governing board of the school district may determine to which charter school to sell or lease the property.

(c) The price at which property described in this section is sold pursuant to this section shall not exceed the school district’s cost of acquisition, adjusted by a factor equivalent to the percentage increase or decrease in the cost of living from the date of purchase to the year in which the offer of sale is made, plus the cost of any school facilities construction undertaken on the property by the school district since its acquisition of the land, adjusted by a factor equivalent to the increase or decrease in the statewide cost index for class B construction, as annually
 determined by the State Allocation Board pursuant to Section 17072.10, from the year the improvement is completed to the year in which the sale is made. In the event a statewide cost index for class B construction is not available, the school district shall use a factor equal to the average statewide cost index for class B construction for the preceding 10 calendar years. In no event shall the price be less than 25 percent of the fair market value of the property described in this section or less than the amount necessary to retire the share of local bonded indebtedness plus the amount of the original cost of the approved state aid applications on the property. The percentage of annual increase or decrease in the cost of living shall be the amount shown for January 1 of the applicable year by the then current Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumers Price Index for the area in which the schoolsite is located.

(d) Land that is leased pursuant to
 this section shall be leased at an annual rate of not more than 5 percent of the maximum sales price determined pursuant to subdivision (c), adjusted annually by a factor equivalent to the percentage increase or decrease in the cost of living for the immediately preceding year. The percentage of annual increase or decrease in the cost of living shall be the amount shown for January 1 of the applicable year by the then current Bureau of Labor Statistics Consumers Price Index for the area in which the schoolsite is located.

(e) The sale or lease of the real property of a school district, as authorized under subdivision (a), shall not occur until the school district advisory committee has held hearings pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17390.

(f) This section shall only apply to real property identified by a school district as surplus property after July 1, 2012. A school
 district selling or leasing surplus property is not required to offer that property to a charter school pursuant to this section on or after July 1, 2016.

(g) The construction of a school building, as defined in Section 17368, located on real property purchased by a charter school pursuant to this section shall comply with the design and construction requirements pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365). The reconstruction or alteration of, or an addition to, a school building, as defined in Section 17368, located on real property purchased by a charter school pursuant to this section is required to comply with the design and construction requirements pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365) only if the building complied with those sections on the date the real property was purchased by the charter school.

(h) A charter school selling real property obtained pursuant to this section shall use the proceeds only for capital outlay, maintenance, and other facility-related costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 48, Sec. 21.   (AB 86)   Effective July 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

17458.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, the governing board of a school district complying with Section 101238.2 of Title 22 of the California
 Code of Regulations and seeking to sell or lease real property it deems to be surplus property and for which a charter school has not accepted an offer to purchase or lease pursuant to Section 17457.5, may first offer that property for sale or lease to a contracting agency, as defined in Section 8208, pursuant to the following conditions:

(1) The real property sold or leased shall be used by the contracting
 agency, or by
 a successor in interest to the contracting agency, exclusively for the delivery of child care and development services, as defined in Section 8208, for a period of not less than five years from the date upon which the real property is made available to that agency, or successor in interest, pursuant to the sale, or, in the event of a lease, until the real property is returned to the possession of the school district, whichever occurs earlier.

(2) In the event that the contracting agency, or any successor in interest, fails to comply with the condition set forth in paragraph (1), that agency, or successor in interest, that purchased the real property, is required immediately to offer that real property for sale pursuant to this article and Article 5 (commencing with Section 17485) and to sell the
 property pursuant to those provisions. The agency, or its successor in interest, shall comply, in that regard, with all requirements under those provisions that would otherwise apply to a school district, except that a sale price computed under subdivision (a) of Section 17491 shall be based upon the cost of acquisition incurred by the school district that sold the property pursuant to this subdivision, rather than that incurred by the contracting agency or its successor in interest. In the event, alternatively, of a lease of real property pursuant to this subdivision, the failure by the contracting agency, or any successor in interest, to comply with paragraph (1) shall constitute a breach of the lease, entitling the school district to immediate possession of the real property, in addition to any damages to which the school district may be entitled under the lease agreement.

(3) The school district, and each of the entities authorized to receive offers of sale pursuant to this article or Article 5 (commencing with Section 17485), has standing to enforce the conditions set forth in this subdivision, and shall be entitled to the payment of reasonable attorneys’ fees incurred as a prevailing party in any action or proceeding brought to enforce any of those conditions.

(b) No sale or lease of the real property of a school district, as authorized under subdivision (a), may occur until the school district advisory committee has held hearings pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17390.

(c) This section
 is in addition to, and shall not limit the requirements of, Article 5 (commencing with Section 17485), but this section may be
 used
 with regard to property that the governing board of a school district may retain under Section 17490.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 37.5.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17459.

The sale of real property pursuant to this article shall be subject to the provisions of Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17460.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of this section or Sections 17456, 17457, and 42133, the West Contra Costa Unified School District, formerly known as the Richmond Unified School District, may enter into an agreement to lease any real property pursuant to Section 17456 and may use the financing proceeds from the agreement to terminate the Lease-Purchase Agreement, dated May 1, 1988, between the Richmond Unified School District Financing Corporation and the Richmond Unified School District. However, any property that has been leased, rented,
 sold, or otherwise utilized pursuant to Section 41470 may not be leased pursuant to this section.

(b) The West Contra Costa Unified School District shall notify the Controller at the time the district enters into a lease agreement pursuant to subdivision (a). That notice shall set forth a schedule of the rental payments payable under the lease agreement and shall include the name and address of the trustee to whom the right to receive the rental payments has been assigned.

(c) Upon written notification by the trustee that the school district has not made one or more of the rental payments required by the terms of the lease, the Controller shall pay to the trustee from Section A of the State School Fund the defaulted rental payment. That payment by the Controller shall not exceed the amount of any apportionment entitlement of the district to moneys in Section A of the State School
 Fund, less any payments required in that fiscal year to repay any state loans made to the district. The Controller shall withhold the amount of any payment made under this subdivision, including reimbursement of the Controller’s administrative costs as determined under a schedule approved by the California Debt Advisory Commission, from subsequent apportionments to the West Contra Costa Unified School District from Section A of the State School Fund.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the state to make any payment to, or on behalf of, the West Contra Costa Unified School District from Section A of the State School Fund in any amount, pursuant to any particular allocation formula, or to make any other payment to, or on behalf of, the district, including, but not limited to, any payment of those rental payments.

(e) Any apportionments made by the Controller
 pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be deemed to be an allocation to the West Contra Costa Unified School District for purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, and for purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41200) of Part 24.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17461.

(a) The governing board of any school district that has, by majority vote, established a standard rate or rates for the lease pursuant to this article of its real property may, by majority vote, delegate to the officer or employee as the governing board may designate, the power to enter into any lease, for and on behalf of the district, of any real property of the school district, with respect to which real property either the district has received only one sealed proposal that conforms with the existing standard rate or rates, from a
 responsible bidder, and no oral bid that would meet the requirements of Section 17473, or the lease is to be entered into pursuant to Section 17480.

(b) The governing board of any school district may, by majority vote, delegate to such officer or employee as the governing board may designate, the power to enter into any lease, permit, or agreement for the use by the district of buildings or other facilities if the use is to be granted to the district without charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17462.

(a) The funds derived from the sale of surplus property shall be used for capital outlay or for costs of maintenance of school district property that the governing board of the school district determines will not recur within a five-year period. Proceeds from a lease of school district property with an option to purchase may be deposited into a restricted fund for the routine repair of district facilities, as defined by the State Allocation Board, for up to a five-year period. In addition, the proceeds from the sale or lease with option to
 purchase may be deposited in the general fund of the district if the school district governing board and the State Allocation Board have determined that the district has no anticipated need for additional sites or building construction for the ten-year period following the sale or lease with option to purchase, and the district has no major deferred maintenance requirements. Proceeds from the sale or lease with option to purchase of school district property shall be used for one-time expenditures, and may not be used for ongoing expenditures including, but not limited to, salaries and other general operating expenses.

(b) The proceeds may also be deposited into a special reserve fund for capital outlay, for costs of maintenance of school district property that the governing board determines will not recur within a five-year period, or for the future maintenance and renovation of schoolsites if the district governing board and the State
 Allocation Board have determined that the district has no anticipated need for schoolsites or building construction or major deferred maintenance projects for a ten-year period following the sale or lease with option to purchase. Proceeds deposited in the special reserve fund shall not be available for general operating expenses as provided in Section 42842.

(c) The State Allocation Board, in consultation with the department, shall adopt regulations that govern the use of proceeds pursuant to this section for one-time expenditures and define ongoing expenditures for purposes of subdivision (a).

(d) Notwithstanding a determination by the State Allocation Board pursuant to subdivision (a) that a school district has no anticipated need for additional sites or building construction for the ten-year period following the sale or lease with option to purchase of surplus school property,
 the district may apply for new construction or modernization funding pursuant to this chapter if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) Five years have elapsed since the date upon which the sale or lease with option to purchase was executed.

(2) The State Allocation Board determines that the district has demonstrated enrollment growth or a need for additional sites or building construction that the district could not have easily anticipated at the time the board made its original determination that the district had no anticipated need for the ten-year period following the sale or lease with option to purchase.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 810, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17462.3.
